Wyoming, session 2026, HB0084.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-26-107(a) by creating a new
paragraph (v) is amended to read:

22-26-107. Falsifying election documents.

(a) Falsifying election documents consists of
performing any of the following acts with the intent to
deceive or mislead an elector or an election official:

HB0084

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0249
(v) Submitting a false post-election ballot
audit to the secretary of state under W.S. 22-6-130.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0084